Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4818.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [604A.45] INHERENT RISK; MOTORIZED ACTIVITIES. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Go-cart" means a motor vehicle, as defined in section 169.011, subdivision 42, that: new text end new text begin (1) has four wheels; new text end new text begin (2) has seating for up to two individuals; new text end new text begin (3) is designed with: new text end new text begin (i) an open frame, exposed frame components, open wheels, or a combination; and new text end new text begin (ii) the bottom of the seat or seats commonly positioned no more than two inches above the top of the chassis frame rails; new text end new text begin (4) does not have doors, cargo capacity, or an enclosed cabin except for a roll cage or exposed frame components; and new text end new text begin (5) was not originally manufactured to meet federal motor vehicle safety standards in Code of Federal Regulations, title 49, part 571, and successor requirements. new text end new text begin (c) "Inherent risk of motorized activities" means dangers, hazards, or conditions that are an integral part of motorized recreational activities, including but not limited to: new text end new text begin (1) variations in terrain, surface, subsurface, or environmental conditions, whether natural or man-made; new text end new text begin (2) collisions with natural or man-made objects, vehicles, persons, or animals; new text end new text begin (3) operator error, judgment, or inexperience, including loss of control or mechanical failure resulting from operator error; new text end new text begin (4) weather conditions, acts of nature, or changes in visibility or traction; new text end new text begin (5) the presence, action, or inaction of a spectator; or new text end new text begin (6) the aggravation of injuries or illness due to the location of the activity, including remote areas where medical assistance may be delayed. new text end new text begin (d) "Motorized recreational vehicle" means: new text end new text begin (1) an off-highway vehicle, as defined in section 84.771; new text end new text begin (2) a snowmobile, as defined in section 84.81, subdivision 3; new text end new text begin (3) a utility task vehicle, as defined in section 169.045, subdivision 1, clause (3); new text end new text begin (4) a golf cart; new text end new text begin (5) a go-cart; new text end new text begin (6) an electric-assisted bicycle, as defined in section 169.011, subdivision 27, when primarily operated with the motor engaged; new text end new text begin (7) a motorcycle, as defined in section 169.011, subdivision 44; new text end new text begin (8) a motorized bicycle, as defined in section 169.011, subdivision 45; and new text end new text begin (9) a motorized foot scooter, as defined in section 169.011, subdivision 46. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Limitations; liability. new text end new text begin A participant using a motorized recreational vehicle in a recreational, competitive, educational, instructional, or exhibition activity that involves operating, riding, driving, or using a motorized recreational vehicle shall not maintain an action or recover damages for injury or death due to negligence against an individual, partnership, association, club, government, or business entity that owns, manages, permits, or sponsors an activity or event involving motorized recreational vehicles related to the inherent risks of motorized activities as defined in this section. A participant includes an individual who rides, operates, assists in maintaining, or otherwise participates in a motorized recreational vehicle activity, regardless of whether they pay a fee to participate. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Exceptions; liability. new text end new text begin This section does not prevent or limit liability if the injury or death was proximately caused by: new text end new text begin (1) conduct that constitutes gross negligence, willful or wanton misconduct, intentional harm, or criminal conduct; or new text end new text begin (2) the use of a motorized recreational vehicle or safety equipment that was provided by a person other than the participant when the person knew the motorized recreational vehicle or safety equipment was unreasonably dangerous for its intended use. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Warning displays; application of other laws. new text end new text begin (a) An individual, partnership, association, club, government, or business entity that owns, manages, permits, or sponsors an activity or event involving motorized recreational vehicles has limited liability as provided by this section if warning signs are posted and maintained in clearly visible locations at the site of the activity or event, including trail heads, entrances to areas where motorized recreational activities occur, and in locations where participants register, sign waivers, or otherwise gain access to the activity involving a motorized recreational vehicle. The warning signs must be printed in black letters on contrasting background with lettering of sufficient size to be easily read and include: "WARNING: Under Minnesota law, the use of a motorized recreational vehicle is an inherently dangerous activity and participants assume the risk of injury or death." Failure to post a sign that substantially complies with the requirements of this section does not create a presumption of liability, but may be considered by the court when determining the applicability of this section. new text end new text begin (b) This section does not affect the applicability of workers' compensation law to employer and employee relationships, and shall not be construed to limit or modify any defense or immunity to liability available under other provisions of law. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2026, and applies to causes of action accruing on or after that date. new text end